Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.4465, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Use of funds; Metropolitan Council. (a) Sales tax revenue is available as follows: (1) five percent for active transportation, as determined by the Transportation Advisory Board under subdivision 3; and (2) 95 percent for transit system purposes under sections 473.371 to 473.452,new text begin except as specified under subdivision 5,new text end including but not limited to operations, maintenance, and capital projects. (b) The council must expend a portion of sales tax revenue in each of the following categories: (1) improvements to regular route bus service levels; (2) improvements related to transit safety, including additional transit officials, as defined under section 473.4075; (3) maintenance and improvements to bus accessibility at transit stops and transit centers; (4) transit shelter replacement and improvements under section 473.41; (5) planning and project development for expansion of arterial bus rapid transit lines; (6) operations and capital maintenance of arterial bus rapid transit; (7) planning and project development for expansion of highway bus rapid transit and bus guideway lines; (8) operations and capital maintenance of highway bus rapid transit and bus guideways; (9) zero-emission bus procurement and associated costs in conformance with the zero-emission and electric transit vehicle transition plan under section 473.3927; (10) demand response microtransit service provided by the council; (11) financial assistance to replacement service providers under section 473.388, to provide for service, vehicle purchases, and capital investments related to demand response microtransit service; (12) financial assistance to political subdivisions and tax-exempt organizations under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code for active transportation; and (13) wage adjustments for Metro Transit hourly operations employees. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.4465, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Prohibition. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The council is prohibited from expending sales tax revenue on deleted text begin the Southwestdeleted text end new text begin anynew text end light rail transit deleted text begin (Green Line Extension)deleted text end new text begin or passenger railnew text end project. deleted text begin (b) Paragraph (a) expires on the date of expiration of the Metropolitan Governance Task Force as specified under Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 4, section 123, subdivision 11. deleted text end